District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.08

Registration and renewal fees.

(a)

An application for registration or renewal of registration must be accompanied by a fee established pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

The Mayor shall, by rule, establish reasonable fees for:

(1)

An initial application for registration;

(2)

An application for registration based upon a certificate of registration or licensure issued by another State;

(3)

An application for renewal of registration; and

(4)

An application for renewal of registration based upon an application for renewal of registration or licensure submitted in another State.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.